Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 1 General Provisions
21-1-603. Public employer conduct prohibited — Good faith communication.

A public employer shall not take adverse action against a public employee because the public employee or a person authorized to act on behalf of the public employee communicates in good faith to an appropriate authority:

The existence of waste of public funds, property, or manpower, including federal funds, property, or manpower administered or controlled by a public employer; or

A violation or suspected violation of a law, rule, or regulation adopted under the law of this state or a political subdivision of the state.

The communication shall be made at a time and in a manner which gives the public employer reasonable notice of need to correct the waste or violation.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, a public employee communicates in good faith if there is a reasonable basis in fact for the communication of the existence of waste or of a violation.

Good faith is lacking when the public employee does not have personal knowledge of a factual basis for the communication or when the public employee knew or reasonably should have known that the communication of the waste or of the violation was malicious, false, or frivolous.

A public employer shall not take an adverse action against a public employee because the employee participates or gives information in an investigation, hearing, court proceeding, legislative or other inquiry, or in any form of administrative review.

A public employer shall not take an adverse action against a public employee because an employee has objected to or refused to carry out a directive that the employee reasonably believes violates a law or a rule or regulation adopted under the authority of laws of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

A public employer shall not take an adverse action against a public employee because of a report of a loss of public funds under § 25-1-124.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment added the subdivision designations in (a); in present (a)(1), inserted “public” preceding the third occurrence of “employee” and added “to an appropriate authority” at the end; in present (a)(1)(A), substituted “including” for “excluding” and inserted “administered or controlled by a public employer”; and deleted “to an appropriate authority” from the end of present (a)(1)(B).

The 2015 amendment added (e).

ALR.

What constitutes activity of employee protected under state whistleblower protection statute covering employee's “report,” “disclosure,” “notification,” or the like of wrongdoing—Sufficiency of report. 10 A.L.R.6th 531.

What constitutes activity of employee, other than “reporting” wrongdoing, protected under state whistleblower protection statute. 13 A.L.R.6th 499.

What Constitutes Activity of Private-Sector Employee Protected under State Whistleblower Protection Statute Covering Employee's “Report,” “Disclosure,” “Notification,” or the Like of Wrongdoing — Nature of Activity Reported. 36 A.L.R.6th 203.

What Constitutes Activity of Public or State Employee Protected under State Whistleblower Protection Statute Covering Employee's “Report,” “Disclosure,” “Notification,” or the Like of Wrongdoing — Nature of Activity Reported. 37 A.L.R.6th 137.

Ark. L. Notes.

Norwood, The At-Will Doctrine Twenty Years After Gladden and Sterling Drug, 2008 Ark. L. Notes 55.

Because the circuit court previously ruled that the employee violated multiple rules and policies, it was clear that his termination was the result of that misconduct and not related to any communication between the employee and the city administrator; that previous ruling did, in fact, establish the city's affirmative defense to the whistle-blower claim.Barrows v. City of Fort Smith, 2010 Ark. 73, 360 S.W.3d 117 (2010).

Teacher did not have a cause of action against a school district under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., because the teacher was terminated for misconduct — insubordination, inappropriate and offensive behavior, and making defamatory statements, rather than for any statements he made under the Act. The teacher offered no proof whatsoever of any retaliation or that the reasons given for his termination were a pretext.Hollis v. Fayetteville Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2015 Ark. App. 544, 473 S.W.3d 45 (2015).

Circuit court erred in denying a university's motion to dismiss because a terminated employee failed to state facts that would entitle him to relief under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act (AWBA), §21-1-601 et seq., and that would constitute a waiver of sovereign immunity under that statute. Because the complaint did not identify any conduct attributable to the university's board of trustees that violated the AWBA, no exception to sovereign immunity existed, and the suit was barred by the doctrine of sovereign immunity.Johnson v. Butler, 2016 Ark. 253, 494 S.W.3d 412 (2016).

Circuit court properly granted a city and police officers summary judgment because an employee failed to demonstrate the existence of a genuine issue of material fact that he was not terminated for poor job performance; the city and officers presented the employee's deposition testimony in which he admitted to various performance issues, and the chief of police stated he terminated the employee based on information he received from the employee's chain of command. Entmeier v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 517 (2016).

Summary judgment on an employee's claim under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq.,was improper because reasonable minds could determine there was evidence connecting the employee's whistle-blowing communication to the adverse actions he incurred; the employee became the subject of internal investigations almost immediately after his whistle-blowing communication and he presented evidence supporting a causal connection. Bales v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 491 (2016) (substituted op. on reh'g).

Circuit court erred in granting a city and the chief of the police department summary judgment on an employee's claim under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act because reasonable minds could conclude that the adverse actions the employee suffered were a result of his whistle-blowing communication; evidence showed that the chief may not have been a neutral arbiter during the investigatory proceedings against the employee. Bales v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 491 (2016) (substituted op. on reh'g).

Although the third employee had established an issue of fact as to whether he was a whistle-blower in connection with his report on improper overtime usage, summary judgment was properly granted against him as he failed to offer evidence linking his formal reprimand to his alleged whistle-blowing communication; the employee therefore failed to meet defendants' evidence that the disciplinary measures he received were the result of employee misconduct or poor work performance and were not retaliatory. Bales v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 491 (2016) (substituted op. on reh'g).

There was sufficient evidence that the employee was a public employee, because the employee was a person, and it was undisputed that he performed part-time services in exchange for wages from the Arkansas Department of Career Education, a public employer.State v. Means, 2013 Ark. 173, 426 S.W.3d 922 (2013).

Law professor's Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act (AWBA) individual-capacity claims against state university officials were properly dismissed because the AWBA does not provide for suits against individuals.Steinbuch v. Univ. of Ark., 2019 Ark. 356, 589 S.W.3d 350 (2019).

In the event the Office of Personnel Management implements an employee grievance mediation program, a public employee or public employer may voluntarily participate in mediation under the office's mediation program if either one wishes to resolve a dispute between them that involves an adverse action taken against the public employee.

Voluntary mediation shall occur before a civil action in which the public employee and public employer are parties has been initiated in a court.

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall adopt voluntary mediation application and request forms.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (f)(3).

Per the holding in Board of Trustees v. Andrews, 2018 Ark. 12, to the extent the legislature subjected the State to liability in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., it is prohibited by Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 20, and the circuit court erred when it denied defendant’s motion for judgment on the pleadings based on sovereign immunity.The General Assembly’s choice to abrogate sovereign immunity in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act is prohibited by the Arkansas Constitution.Ark. Cmty. Corr. v. Barnes, 2018 Ark. 122, 542 S.W.3d 841 (2018).

Because terminated county employee's actions of reporting alleged misdeeds to quorum court members, sitting as a grievance committee, was reporting to the “appropriate authorities,” under §21-1-602(2)(A)(ii), evidence supporting terminated employee's claim under the Whistle-Blower Act created a question of fact and, thus, it was error for the trial court to have granted the county's motion for a directed verdict. Crawford County v. Jones, 365 Ark. 585, 232 S.W.3d 433 (2006).

Summary judgment on an employee's claim under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq.,was improper because reasonable minds could determine there was evidence connecting the employee's whistle-blowing communication to the adverse actions he incurred; the employee became the subject of internal investigations almost immediately after his whistle-blowing communication and he presented evidence supporting a causal connection. Bales v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 491 (2016) (substituted op. on reh'g).

Circuit court erred in granting a city and the chief of the police department summary judgment on an employee's claim under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act because reasonable minds could conclude that the adverse actions the employee suffered were a result of his whistle-blowing communication; evidence showed that the chief may not have been a neutral arbiter during the investigatory proceedings against the employee. Bales v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 491 (2016) (substituted op. on reh'g).

Although the third employee had established an issue of fact as to whether he was a whistle-blower in connection with his report on improper overtime usage, summary judgment was properly granted against him as he failed to offer evidence linking his formal reprimand to his alleged whistle-blowing communication; the employee therefore failed to meet defendants' evidence that the disciplinary measures he received were the result of employee misconduct or poor work performance and were not retaliatory. Bales v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 491 (2016) (substituted op. on reh'g).

Teacher did not have a cause of action against a school district under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., because the teacher was terminated for misconduct — insubordination, inappropriate and offensive behavior, and making defamatory statements, rather than for any statements he made under the Act. The teacher offered no proof whatsoever of any retaliation or that the reasons given for his termination were a pretext.Hollis v. Fayetteville Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2015 Ark. App. 544, 473 S.W.3d 45 (2015).

Circuit court did not err in dismissing the whistle-blower claims where a former employee failed to provide any proof that her suspension and termination were the result of reporting the transit director's alleged theft, rather than the stated insubordination and budget cuts, and another employee had testified that his problems at work began before he reported the director's alleged theft.Fennell v. City of Pine Bluff, 2016 Ark. App. 275, 492 S.W.3d 887 (2016).

Circuit court properly granted a city and police officers summary judgment because an employee failed to demonstrate the existence of a genuine issue of material fact that he was not terminated for poor job performance; the city and officers presented the employee's deposition testimony in which he admitted to various performance issues, and the chief of police stated he terminated the employee based on information he received from the employee's chain of command. Entmeier v. City of Fort Smith, 2016 Ark. App. 517 (2016).

Whistleblower retaliation suit under False Claims Act (FCA) was not time-barred by 180-day limit applied to Arkansas public employee whistleblowers because protections of FCA extend to any employee, not just those in public sector, and other state statutes with longer limitations periods were more closely analogous.Townsend v. Bayer Corp., 774 F.3d 446 (8th Cir. 2014).

Cited: Barrows v. City of Fort Smith, 2010 Ark. 73, 360 S.W.3d 117 (2010).

The compensation for lost wages, benefits, and any other remuneration; or

The payment by the public employer of reasonable court costs and attorney's fees.

Reinstated to his or her position until the conclusion of the civil action brought under this subchapter; or

Reinstated to his or her position and placed on paid administrative leave until the conclusion of the civil action brought under this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (b); designated the existing language as (a); and added “or” at the end of (a)(4).

Ark. L. Rev.

Robert C. Dalby, Comment: Too Plain to Be Misunderstood: Sovereign Immunity Under the Arkansas Constitution, 71 Ark. L. Rev. 761 (2019).

Per the holding in Board of Trustees v. Andrews, 2018 Ark. 12, to the extent the legislature subjected the State to liability in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., it is prohibited by Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 20, and the circuit court erred when it denied defendant’s motion for judgment on the pleadings based on sovereign immunity.The General Assembly’s choice to abrogate sovereign immunity in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act is prohibited by the Arkansas Constitution.Ark. Cmty. Corr. v. Barnes, 2018 Ark. 122, 542 S.W.3d 841 (2018).

Employee who prevailed on appeal of a postjudgment order related to judgments entered pursuant to the Whistle-Blower Act, subdivision (5) of this section, was denied attorneys'fees under the act because the judgment on appeal was not rendered under this act, but rather was decided based primarily on federal and state income tax law.Arkansas Dep't of Health & Human Servs. v. Storey, 372 Ark. 175, 271 S.W.3d 500 (2008).

Because former employee's claims for injunctive relief were unquestionably legal claims against the State of Arkansas, sovereign immunity barred his claims under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., and the state and federal constitutions against the state officials in their official capacities; and plaintiff's conclusory statements and bare allegations were insufficient to establish an illegal, unconstitutional, or ultra vires act such that sovereign immunity would not apply.Harris v. Hutchinson, 2020 Ark. 3, 591 S.W.3d 778 (2020).

Arkansas Governor did not waive sovereign immunity by signing the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act because the governor does not enact legislation.Harris v. Hutchinson, 2020 Ark. 3, 591 S.W.3d 778 (2020).

Supreme Court of Arkansas declined to overturn Bd. of Trs. of Univ. of Ark. v. Andrews, 2018 Ark. 12.Harris v. Hutchinson, 2020 Ark. 3, 591 S.W.3d 778 (2020).

Where former state employee alleged that he was terminated because he refused to violate the state policy to hire the most qualified individual for a position, and asserted claims under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., and the federal and state constitutions, the circuit court erred when it found that sovereign immunity barred plaintiff's claims against the state officials in their individual capacities; in their individual capacities, the state officials did not enjoy the immunity granted to the State under Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 20.Harris v. Hutchinson, 2020 Ark. 3, 591 S.W.3d 778 (2020).

Cited: Crawford County v. Jones, 365 Ark. 585, 232 S.W.3d 433 (2006).

Per the holding in Board of Trustees v. Andrews, 2018 Ark. 12, to the extent the legislature subjected the State to liability in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §21-1-601 et seq., it is prohibited by Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 20, and the circuit court erred when it denied defendant’s motion for judgment on the pleadings based on sovereign immunity.The General Assembly’s choice to abrogate sovereign immunity in the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act is prohibited by the Arkansas Constitution.Ark. Cmty. Corr. v. Barnes, 2018 Ark. 122, 542 S.W.3d 841 (2018).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the (a) designation; and added (b) and (c).

A court may order that reasonable attorney's fees and court costs be awarded to an employer if the court determines that an action brought by a public employee under this subchapter is without basis in law or fact.

A public employee shall not be assessed attorney's fees under this section if, after exercising reasonable and diligent efforts after filing the suit, the public employee files a voluntary nonsuit concerning the employer within sixty (60) calendar days after determining that the employer would not be liable for damages.

This subchapter shall not be construed to permit a disclosure which would diminish or impair the rights of any person or any public official to the continued protection of confidentiality of records or working papers where a statute or the common law provides for protection.

(1)All materials and documentation, including without limitation notes, memoranda, recordings, preliminary drafts of investigation reports, and other data gathered in connection with a communication regarding the existence of waste or of a violation, are privileged and confidential and are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this section.

This section applies without limitation to communications regarding the existence of waste or of a violation received by a telephone hotline allowing for the reporting of fraud, waste, or abuse in government.

A public employer shall use appropriate means to notify its public employees of their protection and obligations under this subchapter.

(1)A public employer shall post in a conspicuous place a printed sign at least eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8½" x 11") in size that:

Informs a public employee of the provisions of this subchapter;

Describes an appropriate authority to whom the public employee may communicate in good faith regarding the existence of waste or of a violation; and

If a telephone hotline exists for the reporting of fraud, waste, or abuse in government, contains the number of the telephone hotline.

Arkansas Legislative Audit shall:

Prepare the printed sign under subdivision (b)(1) of this section; and

Make the sign available electronically on its Internet website in a format that allows it to be printed by a public employer for posting in compliance with subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the (a) designation; and added (b).

State university's provision of statutorily required notice of employees’ rights under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act did not waive the university’s sovereign immunity; providing the notice did not voluntarily abandon a known right because the university was required by statute to notify employees.Steinbuch v. Univ. of Ark., 2019 Ark. 356, 589 S.W.3d 350 (2019).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the severability of the subchapter, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 94. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 9.

As used in this section:

An agency, department, board, commission, division, office, bureau, council, authority, or other instrumentality of the State of Arkansas, including without limitation the:

Offices of the various Arkansas elected constitutional officers; and

General Assembly and its agencies, bureaus, and divisions; or

A state-supported college, university, technical college, community college, or other institution of higher education or department, division, or agency of a state institution of higher education.

A state employee making a communication under § 21-1-603 shall be eligible to receive a reward in an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of any savings in state funds attributable to changes made based on a communication under § 21-1-603.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, upon the resolution of a matter communicated to an appropriate authority under § 21-1-603, the appropriate authority shall provide a written report detailing the content of the communication and the outcome of the communication to the:

After receiving a written report under subsection (c) of this section, a state employer shall:

The total savings in state funds resulting from the communication under § 21-1-603 for the first full fiscal year in which the changes were implemented;

The name of the state employee who made the communication resulting in the savings of state funds; and

The amount of the reward for which the state employee is eligible. The amount of the reward shall be equal to ten percent (10%) of the total savings in state funds reported under subdivision (d)(2)(A)(i) of this section. If the state employer concludes that the state employee is not eligible for a reward, the state employer shall state the reasons for that determination in the report.

A report under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section shall be submitted to the:

Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Review/PEER Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee;

State employee who made the communication under § 21-1-603 unless the state employee has elected to maintain confidentiality under subsection (g) of this section. The report to the state employee shall include a notice to the state employee of the right to an appeal under subsection (e) of this section; and

Clerk of the Arkansas State Claims Commission.

(1)A state employee may appeal to the Arkansas State Claims Commission in the same manner for filing a claim under § 19-10-208 if the state employee believes that:

A report under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section does not accurately reflect the savings attributable to the changes made based on the communication under § 21-1-603; or

The state employer did not accurately assess the determination of a reward under this section, including without limitation denying a reward to the state employee.

A state employee who pursues an appeal under subdivision (e)(1) of this section is granted the same protection provided to a public employee under §21-1-603.

(A)A written request for an appeal under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall be filed within forty (40) days of the submission of the report under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section.

An appeal to the commission under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall follow the rules and procedures of the commission.

In an appeal to the commission, a state employee shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the:

Amount of savings reported by the state employer under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section does not accurately reflect the savings attributable to the changes made based on the communication under § 21-1-603; or

State employer did not accurately assess the determination of a reward under this section.

(A)The decision of the commission in a matter appealed under this subsection may be appealed only to the Claims Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Claims Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee.

Notice of appeal under subdivision (e)(5)(A) of this section shall be filed with the commission within forty (40) days after the commission renders a decision.

The commission, in a timely manner, shall notify the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee and all parties to the matter when a notice of appeal to the Claims Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council or Claims Subcommittee of the Joint Budget Committee is filed with the commission.

When the commission notifies parties of a decision of the commission, it shall advise the parties of the right of appeal.

(1)(A)Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2) of this section, within thirty (30) days of the end of the period for appeal under subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section or the resolution of an appeal under subsection (e) of this section, whichever is later, the clerk of the commission shall notify a state employer of the amount of a reward to be paid to a state employee.

Upon receipt of notification under subdivision (f)(1) of this section, the state employer shall deliver a check to the clerk of the commission who shall deposit the same as a nonrevenue receipt into the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund from which he or she shall disburse the amount of the reward to the state employee.

(A)No reward under this section shall be paid in excess of twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500).

If the amount of a reward is greater than twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500), the reward shall be referred to the General Assembly for an appropriation.

If a reward is appropriated to a state employer for the benefit of a state employee, it shall be paid from the funds available to the state employer.

A state employee wishing to maintain confidentiality under § 21-1-607 or who otherwise chooses to forego a reward under this section shall request to the appropriate authority that the report under subsection (c) of this section not include the state employee's name or identifying information.

A state employee making a request under subdivision (g)(1) of this section shall not receive a reward under this section.

The name and identifying information of a state employee who requests confidentiality under subdivision (g)(1) of this section is not disclosable under applicable state or federal law.

Except as provided in subdivisions (h)(2) and (3) of this section, a reward under this section shall not be payable for a communication made by a state employee in the normal course of the state employee's job duties.

If a communication in the normal course of a state employee's job duties detailing waste or a violation is not acted upon by the state employer within ninety (90) days, the state employee may make a communication under § 21-1-603 to an appropriate authority and be eligible for a reward under this section.

A report by a state employee of a loss of public funds under § 25-1-124 shall be considered a communication in the normal course of the state employee's job duties if the state employee:

Handles or exerts control over the funds of the state employer;

Participates in making decisions or recommendations concerning the deposit, investment, or expenditure of the funds of the state employer; or

Is responsible for auditing the funds of the state employer.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “is not disclosable under applicable state or federal law” for “shall be exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.” in (g)(3).

The 2015 amendment, in (h)(1), substituted “subdivisions” for “subdivision” and inserted “and (3)”; and added (h)(3).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 1448, § 2, provided: “The Office of Personnel Management of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration shall begin offering nonbinding mediation under this act on July 1, 2014.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 3; 2003, No. 601, § 1; 2015, No. 1103, § 1.

21-1-604. Civil liability — Definition.

A public employee who alleges a violation of this subchapter may bring a civil action for appropriate injunctive relief or actual damages, or both, within one hundred eighty (180) calendar days after the occurrence of the alleged violation of this subchapter.

An action commenced under this section may be brought in the circuit court for the county where the alleged violation occurred, for the county where the complainant resides, or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court if the complaint is filed against an agency, department, or institution of state government.

To prevail in an action brought under the authority of this section, the public employee shall establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the employee has suffered an adverse action because the employee or a person acting on his or her behalf engaged or intended to engage in an activity protected under this subchapter.

As used in this section, “damages” means damages for a job-related injury or loss caused by each violation of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, fringe benefits, retirement service credit, compensation for lost wages, benefits, and any other remuneration, and reasonable court costs and attorney's fees.

(1)A public employer shall have an affirmative defense to a civil action brought by a public employee under this subchapter if the adverse action taken against a public employee was due to employee misconduct, poor job performance, or a reduction in workforce unrelated to a communication made pursuant to §21-1-603.

The public employer must prove the existence of the public employee's misconduct unrelated to the communication by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 6121.

21-1-605. Remedies.

A court in rendering judgment under this subchapter may order any or all of the following remedies:

An injunction to restrain continued violation of the provisions of this subchapter;

The reinstatement of the public employee to the same position held before the adverse action or to an equivalent position;

The reinstatement of full fringe benefits and retirement service credit;

(1)A public employee alleging in a civil action that he or she was terminated from his or her position as the result of adverse action prohibited under §21-1-603 may request an expedited hearing on the issue of the public employee's being reinstated to the public employee's position until the resolution of the civil action brought under this subchapter.

If at an expedited hearing the public employee demonstrates that a reasonable person would conclude that his or her termination was a result of adverse action prohibited under §21-1-603, the court shall order that the public employee be:

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 5; 2017, No. 791, § 1.

21-1-606. Attorney's fees.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 6.

21-1-607. Protection of confidentiality.

Final reports issued by a public employer or an appropriate authority concerning a communication regarding the existence of waste or of a violation and any supporting documentation shall be open to public inspection and copying, except for documents that are exempt from disclosure under other law.

This section does not apply to the name and identifying information of a state employee eligible to receive a reward under §21-1-610 who does not request confidentiality under §21-1-610(g).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 7; 2015, No. 1103, § 2.

21-1-608. Notification of rights.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1523, § 8; 2015, No. 1103, § 3.

21-1-609. [Repealed.]

“State employee” means a person who performs a full-time or part-time service for wages, salary, or other remuneration for a state employer; and

“State employer” means:

State employee who made the communication; and

State employer that was the subject of the communication.

Document the savings in state funds attributable to changes made based on the communication filed under §21-1-603 for one (1) full fiscal year; and

(A)Within thirty (30) days of the end of the first full fiscal year in which the changes made based on the communication filed under §21-1-603 were implemented, issue a report containing:

History.

Acts 2013, No. 211, § 2; 2013, No. 1080, § 1; 2015, No. 1103, § 4.

Subchapter 7

— State Employee Grievances

21-1-701. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Employee” means a person regularly appointed or employed in a position of state service by a state agency for which:

He or she is compensated on a full-time basis or on a pro rata basis; and

A class title and pay grade are established in the appropriation act for the agency or institution in accordance with the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.

“Employee” does not include a supervisory employee;

“Grievance” means an employee's complaint resulting from a termination or suspension;

“State agency” means a board, commission, department, division, or office of state government within the executive branch.

“State agency” does not include:

An institution of higher education;

A public school district;

The Arkansas Department of Transportation; and

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission; and

“Supervisory employee” means an individual having:

Authority in the interest of a state agency to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees of the state agency; or

If his or her exercise of authority requires the use of independent judgment and is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, the responsibility to direct other employees of the state agency by which he or she is employed.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (6)(B)(iii).

The 2019 amendment deleted former (1) through (3), (5), (8), and (9); inserted present (2); and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1448, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
66; 2019, No. 1054, § 1.